Utah statutes.
53-6-206.   Waiver of training course requirement -- Certification exam.

(1)  The director may waive the required basic peace officer training and certify each applicant who passes a written examination, an oral examination, or both a written and oral examination that affirms the applicant's ability in law enforcement.

(2)  A waiver applicant shall:

(a)  furnish evidence of satisfactory completion of a peace officer training program that, in the director's judgment, is equivalent to the program required for certification in this state; and

(b)  furnish evidence that the requirements of Section 53-6-203, relating to qualifications for admission to the Utah training programs have been met.

(3)  A waiver applicant may not exercise peace officer powers until all waiver process requirements have been met.

(4)  An applicant who fails the certification examination must complete the basic training course required by this part and be certified in order to become a peace officer authorized to exercise peace officer powers.

